Hawaii statutes.
[§431:3D-104] Own risk and solvency assessment
requirement. Subject to section 431:3D-106, an insurer or the insurance group
of which the insurer is a member shall regularly conduct an own risk and
solvency assessment consistent with a process comparable to the Own Risk and Solvency
Assessment Guidance Manual. The own risk and solvency assessment shall be conducted
no less than annually but also at any time when there are significant changes to
the risk profile of the insurer or the insurance group of which the insurer is a
member. [L 2016, c 140, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next